Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 9
PUBLIC MEETINGS

29-9-101. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 91:

Entire article repealed, p. 820, § 3, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 19 of chapter 3, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1991, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For the public meetings law for state agencies and the general assembly, see § 24-6-402; for current provisions relating to open meetings, see part 4 of article 6 of title 24.